Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1394XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1394XD (3) 91
jda/jh

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 299.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding
the following new subsections:
NEW SUBSECTION. 7. Who is a military applicant undergoing
military entrance processing.
NEW SUBSECTION. 8. Who is engaged in military service.